Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 29. Department of Enterprise Technology Services

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 1, provides: “(a)
The division of information technology within the department of administration and information and the position and office of state chief information officer are transferred by a type 1 transfer to the department of enterprise technology services created by this act.
All positions, personnel, appropriations, property, equipment and authority in agencies and programs transferred to the department of enterprise technology services by this act are under the control of the department as provided by this act.
The validity of rules, regulations, contracts, agreements or other obligations of agencies or programs transferred by this act is not affected by this act.

“(b)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governor may authorize the use of authorized positions within the department of administration and information and the office of state chief information officer and funds appropriated to those agencies to staff and fund the department of enterprise technology services for the remainder of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2012 and for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2012.
For the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2014, the director of the department of enterprise technology services shall submit an estimated budget to the governor and the governor shall submit a recommended budget for the department in accordance with W.S. 9 2 2907.

“(c)
Notwithstanding W.S. 9 2 2903, the governor may appoint a temporary director for the department of enterprise technology services upon the effective date of this act.
Thereafter the governor shall submit any proposed appointment of a director of the department to the senate in accordance with W.S. 28 12 101 through 28 12 103.”

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 5, provides: “(a)
The directors of the departments of enterprise technology services and administration and information, with recommendations from the information technology policy council or any successor entity formed under the information technology governance program, shall review all existing authorized positions providing information technology support to an executive branch state agency.
The directors shall submit to the governor's office a list of all such positions which provide common or shared services and should be transferred to the department of enterprise technology services in order to more efficiently provide services to the citizens of the state or state agencies.

“(b)
Commencing with the effective date of this section, no vacant position providing information technology support within an executive branch agency shall be filled until the agency director provides to the state chief information officer a description of the position and the agency director's recommendation as to whether the position should remain within the agency, be transferred to the department of enterprise technology or be eliminated with the department of enterprise technology assuming the responsibilities of the position.
The governor may authorize the agency to fill, eliminate or transfer to the department of enterprise technology any position subject to this subsection.

“(c)
By November 1, 2012, the governor shall submit a list to the joint appropriations interim committee of those positions subject to subsection (a) of this section which he recommends should be transferred to the department of enterprise technology services.
The listing
shall include for each position the source of funding and for positions not wholly funded by the state general fund whether the funding source would be affected by transfer of the position.
The governor shall also separately identify any positions eliminated or transferred to the department of enterprise technology pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

“(d)
The joint appropriations interim committee shall review the lists provided and sponsor legislation in the 2013 general session as it determines appropriate to transfer positions and associated equipment and funding to the department of enterprise technology services and to remove from agency budgets positions eliminated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or transferred to the department of information technology.

“(e)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the governor to effect voluntary transfers of positions between agencies as otherwise authorized by law.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 9-2-2901.
Department of enterprise technology services created.

There is created the department of enterprise technology services.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2.

§ 9-2-2902.
Department divisions.

The department shall consist of the following divisions in addition to the office of the director of the department:

Information technology division;

Information services division.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-2903.
Director and division administrators; appointment; removal.

The governor shall appoint a state chief information officer with the advice and consent of the senate. The state chief information officer shall serve as the director of the department of enterprise technology services and shall be the department’s executive and administrative head.

With the approval of the governor, the state chief information officer may appoint administrators for each of the divisions. The governor may remove the state chief information officer and division administrators as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2.

§ 9-2-2904.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Agency” means an office, department, board, commission, council, institution, separate operating agency or any other operating unit of the executive branch of state government. “Agency” shall not include the University of Wyoming or Wyoming community colleges;

“Data analytics” means data analysis, including the ability to use the data for assessment and extraction of policy relevant information;

“Department” means the department of enterprise technology services;

“Enterprise data analytics” means data analytics which affect or are conducted by more than one (1) agency;

“Executive branch” means the executive department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“Information processing software” means all purchased, procured or developed software for use on any information technology equipment;

“Information technology equipment” means all business and personal computing devices, intelligent handheld devices including tablets and smart phones, printers and other related peripheral equipment;

“Judiciary” means the judicial department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“Legislature” means the legislative department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“State chief information officer” means the person appointed in accordance with W.S.

9-2-2903

. The state chief information officer shall also function as the director of the department;

“Telecommunications transport services” means the telecommunication transmission facilities under which voice, data and video communications are distributed between distant locations for use by state agencies, institutions and educational institutions on a shared basis.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-2905.
Duties of the department in assisting the governor.

The department may assist the governor in discharging his duties as chief executive and administrative officer of the executive branch of government of the state of Wyoming. The governor through the department shall:

Coordinate, consolidate and provide information technology services which are used by more than one (1) agency;

Review agency information technology programs, expenditures and management to identify problems and suggest improvements;

Promote economy and efficiency in government use of information technology;

Establish uniform standards of information technology administration; and

Establish uniform practices and reporting for government use of payment processor services.

This article shall be construed to provide the governor, through the department, with a more coordinated and responsive system of information technology management of the executive branch of state government, and to preserve and protect the separation of powers mandated by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution. The legislature and the judiciary shall cooperate with the department and may utilize the services and assistance of the department to achieve economy in government, but information technology procedures affecting the administration of the legislature shall be determined by the legislature and the management council, and information technology procedures affecting the administration of the judiciary shall be determined by the judges for their respective courts, and they shall not be bound by rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2; 2019 ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(v) and made related changes.

§ 9-2-2906.
Office of the state chief information officer and director; authority; duties of department.

The state chief information officer may:

Employ professional, technical and other assistants to work in the director’s office or in any of the divisions, along with other employees necessary to carry out the purpose of this article;

Formulate through his office the policies and programs to be carried out by the department through its respective divisions;

Require employees or applicants for employment who have access to confidential information or records to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information as a condition for a position with the department in accordance with W.S.

7-19-106

and

7-19-201

.

The department shall carry out the following coordination and management functions:

Develop a biennial information technology plan for the executive branch. The department may inventory agency software, hardware, servers and data centers as it determines necessary to develop the plan, using existing information available to the department and as supplemented by agencies upon request of the department;

Implement and maintain an information technology governance program for the agencies;

Establish review criteria for the agencies information technology projects, procurements and purchases;

Develop and implement recommendations for the proper management of agencies information technology resources;

Review and make recommendations to the governor concerning information technology budget requests made by agencies;

Adopt information technology policies and standards and ensure agency compliance with the policies and standards;

Recommend information technology procurement improvements;

Develop and promote information technology training programs for all branches of government;

Encourage information technology coordination, information sharing and collaboration among all branches and levels of government in Wyoming;

Enhance geographic information systems coordination among all governmental users of geographic information systems;

Carry out the duties prescribed by W.S.

9-2-2501

;

Enhance statewide broadband adoption and coordination among all governmental users in coordination with the Wyoming business council and its broadband advisory council;

Advise the governor and the legislature on technology and telecommunications matters;

Establish, maintain and annually evaluate a quality management model. The quality management model shall include training and assurances for data privacy, protection and use throughout the agency and shall track customer feedback on technology services and oversight. The department shall involve the agencies in assessment of needs, successes and areas of improvement and shall produce customer satisfaction and performance reports. The department shall report its findings from the quality management model in the department’s biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

.

The University of Wyoming, Wyoming community colleges, and the judicial and legislative departments of state government may adhere to the standards, policies and plans developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section to the extent feasible, as determined by the entity or the department of government, as applicable.

The department shall carry out the following oversight and approval functions:

Review agency expenditure requests for information technology or telecommunications personnel, hardware or software or contractual services for information technology if the expenditure exceeds the maximum amount established by department policy for small purchases. No funds for purchase in excess of the maximum amount shall be expended until the state chief information officer has approved the expenditure. Upon request for expenditure, the state chief information officer shall review the request and shall:

Disapprove a request which fails to meet existing department standards, security, privacy and procurement policies; and

If the state chief information officer determines a less expensive alternative to effectively accomplish the need is available, approve the request only for the lesser amount.

Review agency expenditures for information technology or telecommunications personnel, hardware or software or contractual services for information technology which are within the maximum amount established by department policy for small purchases as the state chief information officer determines necessary. Agencies shall provide information as requested by the department regarding small purchases;

Establish and enforce data security and privacy policies and standards for the state data infrastructure. These provisions shall be the minimum security and privacy requirements adhered to by all agencies. Agencies may choose to set additional security and privacy requirements to exceed but not in lieu of or that in any way interfere with the standards set by the state chief information officer;

Establish policies and standards for enterprise data analytics;

All computer purchases made via the chief information officer’s state technology replacement program shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this subsection, using standardized pricing established by the program. All funds appropriated for computer acquisition shall be restricted and not expended for any other purpose.

The department shall provide the following services:

Develop and provide computer and information technology services to agencies and the judiciary and the legislature. Central delivery of common services shall be promoted to the extent they encourage a more economical and efficient operation of state programs, while maintaining a compatibility of hardware and software among agencies, the legislature and the judiciary;

Upon request of an agency, provide information and recommendations regarding the installation and acquisition of computer and information technology equipment, the qualifications of information technology personnel and software systems required by the agency. The information and recommendations shall be directed to advising the agency how to comply with the uniform standards, minimize duplication and promote effectiveness in the collection, storage, interchange, retrieval, processing and transmission of information;

Upon request of an agency, provide enterprise data analytics services;

Data analytics security services and validation services as directed by the governor;

The department shall annually apply to the universal service administrative company under the federal communications commission for amounts available to the state under the schools and libraries program of the universal service fund. All federal funds received by the state from the schools and libraries program of the universal service fund shall be deposited into the school foundation program account;

Develop procedures and administer uniform payment processor services and reporting for agencies and upon request, the judiciary and the legislature. In carrying out this paragraph, the department shall:

Administer a statewide contract with a payment processor as provided under W.S. 9-4-217(h);

Develop criteria and procedures for granting waivers to agencies under W.S. 9-4-217(h).

The state chief information officer shall administer through his office all accounting, billing and collection functions required by the department. These activities shall be taken pursuant to policies adopted by the state chief information officer after consultation and in cooperation with the director of the department of administration and information. The policies shall include provisions for attributing shared costs to agencies receiving common services from the department and for interagency accounting, billing and collection for other services provided to individual agencies. The department of enterprise technology services and the department of administration and information shall jointly develop a memorandum of understanding through which the departments will exchange administrative support, accounting functions and information technology services.

The department shall carry out the following functions:

Establish and promulgate rules and regulations governing the use and funding of telecommunications services, equipment, payment processor services, software and networks by agencies;

In consultation with state agencies and educational institutions, develop recommendations for a current and long-range telecommunications transport service plan for state government and higher education involving telephone, radio, microwave, facsimile, closed circuit television, teleconferencing, interactive educational training, public radio, public television, data communications, transmission circuits, fiberoptics, satellites and cellular radio and the integration of these mediums into applicable telecommunications networks. The plan shall be submitted to the governor for approval;

Administer the approved current and long-range plan for use of telecommunications by agencies and coordinate the telecommunications transport service network;

Inventory current telecommunications infrastructure of agencies, solicit comments and recommendations on needs, practices and technologies for providing telecommunications services in the most efficient manner possible, accommodate economic growth and development in the state and enhance educational opportunities at all levels of instruction;

Review all existing and future agencies telecommunications planning, networks, systems and programs and recommend priorities therefor in accordance with the purposes of this section;

As appropriate, coordinate the acquisition of compatible telecommunications equipment, software and licensure for telecommunications transport service networks with agencies and with educational institutions;

Establish telecommunications procedures, standards and records for management of telecommunications transport service networks and facilities for agencies;

Review, assess and ensure compliance with federal and state telecommunications regulations governing the needs and functions of agencies for telecommunication transport services;

Provide telecommunications services including billing, installation and repair of telephone services including interstate and intrastate long distance, to agencies;

Coordinate telecommunications network training for agencies.

Notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section:

The director of the Wyoming department of transportation and the colonel of the Wyoming highway patrol shall administer and control the operation, maintenance and conduct of the two-way, land based mobile and related facilities for the public safety radio-microwave systems specifically provided by the department and patrol and performed by radio technicians, dispatchers and telephone operators. The department shall provide and accommodate agency needs as approved jointly by the department and the agency and as agency budgets allow;

The attorney general shall administer and control the operation and conduct of the criminal law enforcement system and shall coordinate statewide telecommunications network services under this system through the department;

The University of Wyoming and community college districts shall administer the operation and control of telephone data and video systems on the respective campuses and the department shall coordinate statewide telecommunications network services under these systems;

Telecommunications transport service requirements for any agency and educational institutions shall be coordinated through the department;

Any public broadcasting service operating in the state shall be responsible for its operational services and federal licensing. The department shall assist in the coordination of any required statewide telecommunications transport services as appropriate;

The state public safety communications commission established under W.S.

9-2-1101

shall coordinate its statewide telecommunications transport service requirements through the department;

An agency may independently contract with a private service provider to obtain telecommunications services, equipment, software and networks, provided:

The services, equipment and software meet compatibility standards established by the department; and

The agency’s action will result in at least ten percent (10%) savings compared to the cost of similar services, equipment and software provided through the department;

The action is approved as provided by subsection (d) of this section.

The department may, through the infrastructure network developed under the statewide education technology plan in accordance with W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xx), contract with one (1) or more telecommunications providers to provide telecommunications services to:

Private schools if the department determines network capacity is sufficiently available and private schools accessing the network reimburse the department for the costs of services provided under this subsection, including proportionate overhead and administrative costs;

Private health care providers if services are requested by the department of health under this subsection. The department of health shall:

Determine health care services necessary for the effective and efficient operation of a telehealth network in the state;

Notify the department in writing of the services deemed necessary;

Reimburse the department for costs incurred for the provision of telecommunications services under this subsection from funds available for this purpose, including proportionate overhead and administrative costs;

Develop charges for telecommunication services that cover the costs of the provision of telecommunication services to private health care providers; and

In providing or facilitating the provision of services under this subsection, the department of health shall determine that services are not reasonably available from other sources.

The state chief information officer may authorize a designee to carry out any duties assigned, whether denominated as the state chief information officer or director of the department, unless specifically precluded from doing so by statute.

The department shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations to administer this article pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the department or the director to regulate or otherwise have any jurisdiction or authority over nongovernmental providers of telecommunications services or broadband services. Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the department or the state to be a telecommunications services provider to the private sector. To the extent a network is developed and implemented under subsection (g) of this section to provide telecommunications transport services for state government and higher education, rather than purchasing facilities or providing its own communications services for the creation and operation of the unified network, the state of Wyoming shall purchase services from commercial communications carriers to the fullest extent reasonably feasible. Such a network is limited to use only by:

The executive, legislative and judicial branches of Wyoming state government, including the University of Wyoming and community colleges. In relation to use of this network, “Wyoming state government” does not include local government, cities, towns, counties, hospitals, joint powers boards, special districts or other local governmental entities; and

Wyoming public schools and public libraries.

The department shall include in the department’s biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a list of any federal program being implemented by the department. The list shall include the specific statutory authorization, if any, authorizing the department’s implementation of the program. The department shall not be required to report any program pursuant to this subsection for which it is providing solely support services for an agency charged with implementing the federal program.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 129, § 1, effective March 3, 2017; 2017 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 126, § 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

in(b)(xiv), in the fourth sentence, deleted “annually on or before December 1, to the joint appropriations interim committee” and added “in the department's biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

” at the end.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “and privacy” and made similar changes in (d)(i)(A) and (d)(iii).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by Laws 2017, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (d), added (v); in (e), added (v); in the introductory language of (n), added the third and fourth sentences; and in (n) added (i) and (ii).

The second 2017 amendment, by Laws 2017, ch. 129, § 1, added (a)(iii).

Laws 2017, ch. 129, § 2, makes the amendment effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

in (b)(xii), substituted “users in coordination with the Wyoming business council and its broadband advisory council” for “users and where possible among the citizens of the state.”

Laws 2018, ch. 126, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (e)(vi); and in (g)(i), added "payment processor services" following "equipment."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-2907.
Department budget. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2; repealed by 2016 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.